District of Columbia statutes.
2-1515.07

Rules; authority to execute contracts and grants.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

The Mayor may execute contracts, grants, and other legally binding documents to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

History

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-335, § 107, 52 DCR 2025

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Oak Hill Construction Streamlining Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-136, June 16, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 5764).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 107 of Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services Establishment Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-657, December 29, 2004, 52 DCR 481).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 107 of Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-58, March 17, 2005, 52 DCR 3182).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Oak Hill Construction Streamlining Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-332, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2594).